test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-wawi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - wâwi - ok : # -m inanimate noun with poss element, egg
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg: wâwi
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl: wâwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Loc: wâwihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: wâwis
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: wâwisak
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: wâwisihk
     
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwâwim
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwâwim
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: owâwim
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: owâwimiyiw
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwâwiminân
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwâwiminaw
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwâwimiwâw
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: owâwimiwâw
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: owâwimiyiw
     
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwâwima
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwâwima
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: owâwima
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: owâwimiyiwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwâwiminâna
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwâwiminawa
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwâwimiwâwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: owâwimiwâwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: owâwimiyiwa
     
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwâwimis
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwâwimis
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: owâwimis
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: owâwimisiyiw
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwâwimisinân
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwâwimisinaw
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwâwimisiwâw
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: owâwimisiwâw
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: owâwimisiyiw
     
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwâwimisa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwâwimisa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: owâwimisa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: owâwimisiyiwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwâwimisinâna
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwâwimisinawa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwâwimisiwâwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: owâwimisiwâwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: owâwimisiyiwa
     
     wâwi+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwâwimihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwâwimihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: owâwimihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px3iSg+Loc: owâwimiyihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwâwiminâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwâwiminâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwâwimiwâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: owâwimiwâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px3iPl+Loc: owâwimiyihk

     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwâwimisihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwâwimisihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: owâwimisihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3iSg+Loc: owâwimisiyihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwâwimisinâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwâwimisinâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwâwimisiwâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: owâwimisiwâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3iPl+Loc: owâwimisiyihk
